Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 11 Abused and Neglected Children
40-11-12.1.
Family court review.

Within a period of twelve (12) months after a child is placed in the care of the department of children, youth and families pursuant to the provisions of this chapter or §

14-1-5

, or §§

42-72-14

and

14-1-11.1

, and the child has resided in foster care or, pursuant to §§

42-72-14

and

14-1-11.1

, has resided in an out-of-home program that provides services for children with disabilities, including, but not limited to, residential-treatment programs, residential counseling centers, and therapeutic foster-care programs, the department of children, youth and families shall file a motion in the family court requesting a permanency hearing on the status of the child.

Notice of the hearing, along with a copy of the motion, shall be served, in accordance with the rules of procedure of the family court, by the department upon all parties in interest.

At the permanency hearing, all parties shall be allowed to be heard and the foster parents, any pre-adoptive parent, or relative providing care for the child shall be provided with notice of, may attend, and present a report, oral or written, containing recommendations as to the best interest of the child, except that this subsection shall not be construed to require that any foster parent, pre-adoptive parent, or relative providing care for the child be made a party to the review or hearing solely on the basis of such notice and opportunity to be heard.

In determining its order of permanency, the court shall consider, among other things:

The appropriateness of the department’s plan for service to the child and parent;

What services have been offered to strengthen and reunite the family;

Where return home of the child is not likely, what efforts have been or should be made to evaluate or plan for other modes of care;

Any further efforts that have been, or will be made, to promote the best interests of the child; and

The child’s health and safety shall be the paramount concern.

At the conclusion of the hearing, the court shall, in accordance with the best interests of the child, enter an order of permanency:

In the case of a child whose care and custody have been transferred to the department of children, youth and families, direct that the child be returned to, and safety maintained in, the home of the parent, guardian, or relative; or

Direct that the child’s placement in foster care continue on a long-term basis or that the child be placed in an independent-living facility; or

Direct that foster care of the child and reunification efforts be continued if the department of children, youth and families, after a hearing, has demonstrated to the court that continuation of the child in foster care and continued reunification efforts for a determinate period is in the child’s best interests. If the court does not return the child to the care and custody of the parent, guardian, or relative and the court does not direct that foster care of the child and reunification efforts be continued, the department shall institute a proceeding within thirty (30) days of the permanency hearing, pursuant to chapter 7 of title 15, to legally free the child for adoption; or

In the case of a child with an emotional, behavioral, or mental disorder or developmental or physical disability who has, pursuant solely to §§

42-72-14

and

14-1-11.1

, been placed in an out-of-home program that provides services for children with disabilities, including, but not limited to, residential treatment programs, residential counseling centers, and therapeutic foster-care programs, shall determine whether the continuation of such placement is in the best interest of the child; or

For a child who has been placed in foster care by the department for a period of twelve (12) consecutive months, the court shall order that the department institute proceedings for adoption of the child, except in the event that the court determines it is not in the best interest of the child due to one or more of the following factors:

There is a substantial probability that the child shall be returned to the parent within the next three (3) months; or

The parent has maintained regular and consistent visitation and contact with the child, there is a relationship that is beneficial to the child, and there is a substantial probability that the child shall be returned to the parent within the next three (3) months; or

The child is in the care of a relative and the relative is not willing to adopt the child but is willing and capable of providing the child with a stable and permanent environment; or

Any other significant factor that the court finds would not be in the best interest of the child;

The department has documented in the case plan, which shall be presented to the court, a compelling reason for determining that filing a petition for termination of parental rights and a petition for adoption would not be in the best interests of the child; or

The department has not provided to the family of the child, consistent with the time period in the case plan, the services as the department deems necessary for the safe return of the child to the child’s home, if reasonable efforts are required to be made;

In the case of a child who has been in foster care under the temporary custody or custody of the department for fifteen (15) of the most recent twenty-two (22) months, or if the court has determined a child to be abandoned or has made a determination that the parent has engaged in conduct toward any child of a cruel and abusive nature or that the parent has committed murder of another child of the parent, committed voluntary manslaughter of another child of the parent, aided or abetted, attempted, conspired, or solicited to commit such a murder or such a voluntary manslaughter, or committed a felony assault that has resulted in serious bodily injury to the child or to another child of the parent, the department shall file a petition to terminate the parental rights of the child’s parents, and, concurrently, to identify, recruit, process, and approve a qualified family for an adoption, unless:

The child is being cared for by a relative;

The department has documented in the case plan (which shall be available for court review) a compelling reason for determining that filing the petition would not be in the best interests of the child; or

The department has not provided to the family of the child, consistent with the time period in the case plan, such services as the department deems necessary for the safe return of the child to the child’s home, if reasonable efforts are required to be made with respect to the child.

The court shall possess continuing jurisdiction in proceedings under this section and, in the case of children who are continued in foster care or, pursuant to §§

42-72-14

and

14-1-11.1

, continued in an out-of-home program that provides services for children with disabilities, including, but not limited to, residential treatment programs, residential counseling centers, and therapeutic foster-care programs, shall conduct a further permanency hearing whenever it deems necessary or desirable, but at least every twelve (12) months. Nothing herein shall be construed to preclude the department from filing a termination of parental rights’ petition pursuant to the provisions of chapter 7 of title 15.

Each child continued in foster care shall be afforded a permanency hearing not less frequently than every twelve (12) months during the continuation of foster care, which hearing shall determine the permanency plan for the child that includes whether, and if applicable when, the child will be returned to the parent or placed for adoption with the state filing a petition for termination of parental rights, or referred for legal guardianship, or that the child be placed in another planned permanent-living arrangement in cases where the department has documented to the court a compelling reason for determining that it would not be in the best interests of the child to return home, or be referred for termination of parental rights, or be placed for adoption, or be placed with a fit and willing relative, or with a legal guardian.

For the purpose of this chapter, “entering foster care” is defined as placement of a child in the temporary custody or custody of the department in a foster family home or in a private or public childcare facility licensed by the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 90, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 397, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 196, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 388, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 149, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 196, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 87, § 3.

40-11-12.2.
Permanency plan — Order of court.

At every regularly scheduled family court review and/or permanency hearing of any child found to be abused or neglected under §

40-11-12

, or dependent under §

14-1-34

, the department shall present a written reunification and/or permanency plan to the court for approval. The plan shall include whether, and if applicable when, the child will be returned to the parent, placed for adoption, referred for legal guardianship, placed with a fit and willing relative, or (in cases whether the department can show the court compelling reasons why the foregoing placements or referrals would not be in the child’s best interests) placed in another planned permanent-living arrangement. The plan shall clearly set forth the goals and obligations of the department, parent(s), child, and all other parties. The plan may be approved and/or modified by a justice of the family court and incorporated into the orders of the court, at the discretion of the court.

In determining reasonable efforts to be made with respect to a child, and in making such reasonable efforts, the child’s health and safety shall be the paramount concern.

Except as provided in subsection (e), reasonable efforts shall be made to preserve and reunify families:

Prior to the placement of a child in foster care, to prevent or eliminate the need for removing the child from the child’s home, which efforts shall include placement of the child with a blood relative or other family member if such placement is in the best interest of the child; and

To make it possible for a child to safely return to the child’s home.

If continuation of reasonable efforts of the type described in subsection (c) is determined to be inconsistent with the permanency plan for the child, reasonable efforts shall be made to place the child in a timely manner in accordance with the permanency plan and to complete whatever steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child.

Reasonable efforts of the type described in subsection (c) shall not be required to be made with respect to a parent of a child if the court has determined that:

The parent has subjected any child to conduct of a cruel or abusive nature;

The parent has:

Committed murder of another child of the parent; or

Subjected the child to aggravating circumstances, which circumstances shall be abandonment, torture, chronic abuse, and sexual abuse; or

Committed voluntary manslaughter of another child of the parent; or

Aided or abetted, attempted, conspired, or solicited to commit such a murder or such a voluntary manslaughter; or

Committed a felony assault that results in serious bodily injury to the child or another child of the parent; or

The parental rights of the parent to a sibling have been terminated involuntarily.

If reasonable efforts of the type described in subsection (c) are not made with respect to a child as a result of a determination made by the court in accordance with subsection (e):

A permanency hearing shall be held for the child within thirty (30) days after the determination; and

Reasonable efforts shall be made to place the child in a timely manner in accordance with the permanency plan, and to complete whatever steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child.

Reasonable efforts to place a child for adoption or with a legal guardian may be made concurrently with reasonable efforts of the type described in subsection (c).

In the case of a child with respect to whom the permanency plan is adoption or placement in another permanent home, the permanency plan shall include documentation of the steps the department is taking to find an adoptive family or other permanent-living arrangement for the child, to place the child with an adoptive family, a fit and willing relative, a legal guardian, or in another planned permanent-living arrangement, and to finalize the adoption or legal guardianship. At a minimum, the documentation shall include child-specific recruitment efforts, such as the use of state, regional, and national adoption exchanges, including electronic-exchange systems. The department shall not act, or fail to act, to deny or delay placement of a child for adoption when an approved family is available outside of Rhode Island and no other prospective pre-adoptive home is available.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 206, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 309, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 87, § 3.

40-11-12.3.
Guardianship subsidy.

The state may make funds available through the department of children, youth and families for special reimbursement to guardians appointed pursuant to this chapter. These funds will be disbursed in accordance with the guidelines to be promulgated by the department of children, youth and families.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 195, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 263, § 2.

40-11-12.4.
Restraining orders.

Whenever the family court has assumed jurisdiction by way of the filing of a petition pursuant to chapter 1 of title 14 or chapter 11 of this title, the court, upon notice to the individual to be restrained and after a hearing, may restrain the individual so notified from interfering with the personal liberty of another, and may restrain the individual so notified from maliciously causing, or attempting to cause, bodily harm to another, and may restrain any individual so notified from maliciously causing, or attempting to cause, bodily harm to another and, upon a finding by the court that any person has been so harmed, or threatened with harm, the court may prescribe treatment including, but not limited to, outpatient counseling to the individual so restrained.

As used in this section, the term “individual” shall include any party to the petition or any person acting on behalf of the party.

Restraining orders pursuant to this provision shall be issued in conformity with the hearing and notice requirements set forth in §

15-15-1

et seq.

The family court shall have the authority to enforce any violation of a restraining order entered pursuant to this section by contempt.

The contempt order shall not be exclusive and shall not preclude any other available civil or criminal remedies.

Any violation of a restraining order under this chapter protecting a person against bodily harm and/or against threat of imminent bodily injury shall be a misdemeanor that shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or both. The penalties for violation of this section shall also include the penalties provided in §

12-29-5

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 48, § 1.

40-11-12.5.
Review of young adults under the court’s legal supervision and receiving care and placement services from DCYF.

In the case of a young adult, between the ages of eighteen (18) and twenty-one (21), who has executed a voluntary placement agreement for continued care and placement responsibility from the department and for legal supervision of the court, the permanency plan shall document the reasonable efforts made by the department and the young adult to finalize a permanency plan that addresses the goal of preparing the young adult for independence and successful adulthood. This includes, but is not limited to, housing assistance to obtain supervised independent living arrangements, shared living arrangements or extended foster and kinship care; education, vocational assessment, job training and employment plan needed to transition the young adult to self-sufficiency; assisting the young adult in obtaining educational goals; a job, employment/vocational skills; any other services and supports that will assist the young adult in accessing available services; applying for public benefits; acquiring important documents, such as ID card, driver’s license, birth certificate, social security card, health insurance cards, medical records; attending to physical and mental health needs; maintaining relationships with individuals who are important to them and acquiring information about siblings and other maternal and paternal relatives.

Initial judicial determination — The department must petition the court to make a determination whether remaining in foster care is in the young adult’s best interests.

The court must make a determination within one hundred eighty (180) days of the signing of the voluntary placement agreement whether remaining in foster care is in the young adult’s best interest.

The court shall conduct a permanency hearing within one year after the young adult and the department execute a voluntary placement agreement and annually thereafter. At the permanency hearing, the department shall present a written case plan to the court for approval that details the necessary services, care and placement the young adult shall receive to assist the transition to independence and successful adulthood.

The court must determine whether the department has made reasonable efforts to finalize a permanency goal of preparing the young adult for successful transition to independence.

Notice of the court hearings shall be served by the department upon all parties in interest in accordance with the rules of child welfare procedure of the family court.

Periodic formal reviews, shall be held not less than once every one hundred eighty (180) days to assess the progress and case plan of any young adult under the court’s legal supervision and under the care and placement responsibility of DCYF pursuant to a voluntary agreement for extension of care.

The permanency plan shall be reviewed by the court at least once every twelve (12) months at a permanency hearing and by the department in an administrative review within one hundred eighty (180) days after the permanency hearing. The young adult is expected to participate in case planning and periodic reviews.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 15, § 3.

40-11-13.
Confidentiality of reports and records — Penalty for disclosure.

All records concerning reports of child abuse and neglect, including reports made to the department, shall be confidential except as specifically provided by this chapter or as specifically provided by §

42-72-8

or specifically authorized by the family court in furtherance of the purposes directly connected with this chapter.

Any employee or agent of the department violating any of the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be fined not more than two hundred dollars ($200) or shall be imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both.

Nothing in this chapter shall limit the right of the attorney general to receive all records and reports of child abuse when the office is engaged in the investigation of or prosecution of criminal conduct by another relating to the child or other children within the same family unit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 91, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 347, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 54, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 122, § 2.

40-11-13.1.
Destruction of reports and records.

All records concerning reports of child abuse and neglect made pursuant to this chapter, including reports made to the department, shall be destroyed three (3) years after the date of a final determination by either the family court or the department that the reported child abuse or neglect did not in fact occur.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 471, § 1.

40-11-14.
Right to representation in court proceedings.

Any child who is alleged to be abused or neglected as a subject of a petition filed in family court under this chapter, shall have a guardian ad litem appointed by the court to represent this child. In addition, any young adult, who is eligible for extended foster care pursuant to §

14-1-6(c)

and who has executed a voluntary agreement for extension of care may request the appointment of a guardian ad litem or court-appointed counsel. An appointment shall be in the discretion of the court. The cost of counsel in those instances shall be paid by the state.

A volunteer court-appointed special advocate may be assigned to assist the guardian ad litem, in the court-appointed special advocate’s office (CASA):

In order to assist the family court with the ability to ensure that these volunteers, whose activity involves routine contact with minors, are of good moral character, all persons seeking to volunteer for CASA shall be required to undergo a national criminal records check for the purpose of determining whether the prospective volunteer has been convicted of any crime.

A national criminal records check shall include fingerprints submitted to the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) by the department of children, youth and families (DCYF) for a national criminal records check. The national criminal records check shall be processed prior to the commencement of volunteer activity.

For the purposes of this section, “conviction” means, in addition to judgments of conviction entered by a court subsequent to a finding of guilty or a plea of guilty, those instances where the defendant has entered a plea of nolo contendere and has received a sentence of probation and that sentence has not expired and those instances where a defendant has entered into a deferred sentence agreement with the attorney general.

For the purposes of this section, “disqualifying information” means information produced by a national criminal records check pertaining to conviction for the offenses designated as “disqualifying information” pursuant to DCYF policy.

The department of children, youth and families (DCYF) shall inform the applicant, in writing, of the nature of the disqualifying information and, without disclosing the nature of the disqualifying information, shall notify the family court, in writing, that disqualifying information has been discovered.

In those situations in which no disqualifying information has been found, DCYF shall inform the applicant and the family court, in writing, of this fact.

The family court shall maintain on file evidence that national criminal records checks have completed on all volunteer court-appointed special advocates.

The criminal record check shall be conducted without charge to the prospective CASA volunteers. At the conclusion of the background check required pursuant to this section, DCYF shall promptly destroy the fingerprint record of the applicant obtained pursuant to this chapter.

All persons seeking to volunteer for CASA must submit a satisfactory DCYF clearance and participate in a program of training offered by the CASA office.

If the parent or other person responsible for the child’s care is financially unable to engage counsel as determined by the court, the court may, at the request of that person, and in its discretion, appoint the public defender, or other counsel, to represent the person. The cost of other counsel in those instances shall be paid by the state. In every court proceeding under this chapter in which it is a party, the department shall be represented by its legal counsel.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 91, § 2; P.L. 1981, ch. 324, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 377, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 127, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 15, § 2.

40-11-15.
Religious practices.

A parent or guardian practicing his or her religious beliefs that differ from general community standards who does not provide specified medical treatment for a child shall not, for that reason alone, be considered a negligent parent or guardian. However, nothing in this section shall: (1) Prevent the child from being considered abused or neglected if the child is harmed, or threatened with harm, as described in §

40-11-2

; or (2) Preclude the court from ordering medical services or nonmedical services recognized by the laws of this state to be provided to the child where his or her health requires it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 91, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 270, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 599, § 1.

40-11-16.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or application thereof is held to be invalid, the remainder of the chapter and the application of that provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 91, § 2.

40-11-17.
Shaken-baby syndrome prevention initiative.

The department of health shall collaborate with the department of children, youth and families and other state agencies serving families and children, the medical community, law enforcement, human service providers, and child advocacy organizations to develop and implement a comprehensive, statewide initiative to reduce death and disability resulting from shaken-baby syndrome. The initiative shall include, but not be limited to:

Instituting a patient education program on shaken-baby syndrome prevention for all parents of newborns;

Instituting education and training programs on the prevention and diagnosis of shaken-baby syndrome for other parents, caregivers, physicians, and professionals serving children and families;

Assisting in the development of programs to support and serve victims and families affected by shaken-baby syndrome; and

Conducting surveillance and data collection on the incidence of shaken-baby syndrome and traumatic brain injury in infants and young children.

The department of health shall promulgate all rules and regulations necessary to effectuate the purposes of this section.

The department of health, in collaboration with the department of children, youth and families, shall report annually to the general assembly, the status of the shaken-baby syndrome prevention initiative.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 547, § 2.

40-11-18.
Children’s advocacy centers — Services — Requirements.

Children’s advocacy centers shall provide the following services to children in Rhode Island:

Operation of a child-appropriate or child-friendly facility that provides a comfortable, private setting that is both physically and psychologically safe for clients;

Participation in a multidisciplinary team for response to child abuse allegations;

Operation of a legal entity responsible for program and fiscal operations that has established and implemented basic sound administrative practices;

Promotion of policies, practices, and procedures that are culturally competent and diverse;

Conduct forensic interviews in a manner that is of a neutral, fact-finding nature and coordinated to avoid duplicative interviewing;

Provide specialized medical evaluation and treatment made available to clients as part of the team response, either at the CAC or through coordination and referral with other specialized medical providers;

Offer therapeutic intervention through specialized mental health services made available as part of the team response, either at the child advocacy center or through coordination and referral with other appropriate treatment providers;

Offer victim support and advocacy as part of the team response, either at the child advocacy center or through coordination with other providers, throughout the investigation and subsequent legal proceedings;

Conduct team discussions and provide information sharing regarding the investigation, case status, and services needed by the child and family are to occur on a routine basis;

Develop and implement a system for monitoring case progress and tracking case outcomes for team components; and

Shall establish a safe exchange location for children and families who have a parenting agreement or an order providing for visitation or custody of the children that require a safe exchange location.

As used in this section, “cultural competency” means the capacity to function in more than one culture, requiring the ability to appreciate, understand, and interact with members of diverse populations within the local community.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 189, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 262, § 2.

40-11-19.
Parents with disabilities.

The department shall investigate reports of child abuse and neglect as mandated in this chapter. A parent’s disability, as defined in §

42-87-1

, will not constitute sole grounds to initiate an investigation or a finding of child abuse or neglect; provided, that nothing in this section shall:

Prevent a child from being considered abused or neglected if a child is harmed or threatened with harm as described in §

40-11-2

; or

Preclude the court from ordering the furnishing of supportive parenting services to address any impending or actual danger to the child.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 19, § 2, effective May 26, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 20, § 2, effective May 26, 2021.

40-11-20.
Military family advocacy program.

The department shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the military family advocacy program at a local military installation with respect to child abuse and neglect investigations.

Such memorandum of understanding shall establish procedures and protocols for matters including, but not limited to:

Identifying an individual alleged to have committed abuse or neglect as military personnel;

Reporting to a military family advocacy program when an investigation implicating military personnel has been initiated; and

Maintaining confidentiality requirements under state and federal law.

For the purposes of this section, “military family advocacy program” means the program established by the United States Department of Defense to address child abuse and neglect in military families.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 47, § 2, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 48, § 2, effective June 7, 2022.